District of Columbia statutes.
31-4433

Classification of risks and members, payment of dividends, and creation of surplus by mutual companies.

A mutual company may, in its articles of incorporation or in its bylaws, provide for the classification of its risks and of its members and for the payment of dividends and for the creation of a surplus.

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1152, ch. 672, ch. III, § 33
1981 Ed., § 35-632.
1973 Ed., § 35-533.